Utah statutes.
76-8-401.   "Public funds," "public money," and "public officer" defined.

As used in this title:

(1)  "Public funds" or "public money" means funds, money, and accounts, regardless of the source from which they are derived, that are owned, held, or administered by the state or any of its boards, commissions, institutions, departments, divisions, agencies, bureaus, laboratories, or other similar instrumentalities, or any county, city, school district, political subdivision, or other public body.  "Public money" also includes money, funds, or accounts that have been transferred by any of those public entities to a private contract provider of programs or services.  The money, funds, or accounts maintain the nature of public money while in the possession of the private entity that has contracted with a public entity to provide programs or services.

(2)  "Public officer" means:

(a)  all elected officials of the state, a political subdivision of the state, a county, town, city, precinct, or district;

(b)  a person appointed to or serving an unexpired term of an elected office;

(c)  a judge of a court of record and not of record including justice court judges; and

(d)  a member of the Board of Pardons and Parole.

